public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((stra)saver, (re)aver, (re)gaver)
# themeT1 + r/AjE
SFX j Y 287
SFX j 0 í/P aver
SFX j 0 íe/FJL aver
SFX j 0 ímoi/M aver
SFX j 0 íu/Q sver
SFX j 0 imo/EL aver
SFX j 0 me/G aver
SFX j 0 mi/K o
SFX j aver àƚo/B aver
SFX j aver à/FJKLN aver
SFX j aver àlo/B aver
SFX j aver àpieƚo/B aver
SFX j aver àpielo/B aver
SFX j aver àpiemi/K aver
SFX j aver èpieƚo/B aver
SFX j aver èpielo/B aver
SFX j aver èpiemi/K aver
SFX j aver é/FP gaver
SFX j aver éami/K gaver
SFX j aver éau/Q gaver
SFX j aver éeƚo/B gaver
SFX j aver éelo/B gaver
SFX j aver éemi/K gaver
SFX j aver éimo/L gaver
SFX j aver éimoi/M gaver
SFX j aver éitu/O gaver
SFX j aver émo/EL gaver
SFX j aver émoi/M gaver
SFX j aver émome/G gaver
SFX j aver émomene/G gaver
SFX j aver éomi/K gaver
SFX j aver érmene/G gaver
SFX j aver ésimo gaver
SFX j aver étu/O gaver
SFX j aver éu/Q gaver
SFX j aver évami/K gaver
SFX j aver évau/Q gaver
SFX j aver éveƚo/B gaver
SFX j aver évelo/B gaver
SFX j aver évemi/K gaver
SFX j aver évimo/L gaver
SFX j aver évimoi/M gaver
SFX j aver évitu/O gaver
SFX j aver évomi/K gaver
SFX j aver í/FP gaver
SFX j aver ímoi/M gaver
SFX j aver ò/JL aver
SFX j aver òmi/K aver
SFX j aver eƚo/B gaver
SFX j aver elo/B gaver
SFX j aver emi/K gaver
SFX j aver emo/L gaver
SFX j aver epiè/JL aver
SFX j aver epièmi/K aver
SFX j aver epié/P aver
SFX j aver epiémoi/M aver
SFX j aver epiéu/Q aver
SFX j aver epi/FN aver
SFX j aver epia/E aver
SFX j aver epie/EFIJKL aver
SFX j aver epiede/P aver
SFX j aver epiege/P aver
SFX j aver epiemo/EL aver
SFX j aver epien/L aver
SFX j aver epieni/M aver
SFX j aver epime/H aver
SFX j aver epion/EL aver
SFX j aver epioni/M aver
SFX j aver epionme/G aver
SFX j aver epitu/O aver
SFX j aver ese/IT gaver
SFX j aver eva/FJLP gaver
SFX j aver eve/JL gaver
SFX j aver evi/NP gaver
SFX j aver evo/JL gaver
SFX j er é/FP aver
SFX j er éa/FJLP aver
SFX j er éami/K aver
SFX j er éau/Q aver
SFX j er éeƚo/B aver
SFX j er ée/JL aver
SFX j er éelo/B aver
SFX j er éemi/K aver
SFX j er éi/NP aver
SFX j er éimo/L aver
SFX j er éimoi/M aver
SFX j er éitu/O aver
SFX j er émo/EL aver
SFX j er émoi/M aver
SFX j er émome/G aver
SFX j er émomene/G aver
SFX j er éndome/G aver
SFX j er éndomene/G aver
SFX j er éo/JL aver
SFX j er éomi/K aver
SFX j er érmene/G aver
SFX j er ésimo aver
SFX j er étu/O aver
SFX j er éu/Q aver
SFX j er évami/K aver
SFX j er évau/Q aver
SFX j er éveƚo/B aver
SFX j er évelo/B aver
SFX j er évemi/K aver
SFX j er évimo/L aver
SFX j er évimoi/M aver
SFX j er évitu/O aver
SFX j er évomi/K aver
SFX j er í/FP aver
SFX j er ímoi/M aver
SFX j er íu/Q aver
SFX j er ú aver
SFX j er úo/B aver
SFX j er arà/FJLN aver
SFX j er aràe/F aver
SFX j er aràveƚo/B aver
SFX j er aràvelo/B aver
SFX j er aràvemi/K aver
SFX j er arè/JL aver
SFX j er arèmi/K aver
SFX j er aré/P aver
SFX j er arémoi/M aver
SFX j er arémome/G aver
SFX j er arémomene/G aver
SFX j er arésimo/L aver
SFX j er arésimoi/M aver
SFX j er arésitu/O aver
SFX j er aréu/Q aver
SFX j er arí/P aver
SFX j er aría/FJLN aver
SFX j er aríami/K aver
SFX j er aríatu/O aver
SFX j er aríeƚo/B aver
SFX j er aríe/FJL aver
SFX j er aríelo/B aver
SFX j er aríemi/K aver
SFX j er arímoi/M aver
SFX j er arísitu/O aver
SFX j er aríu/Q aver
SFX j er arò/JL aver
SFX j er aròmi/K aver
SFX j er araƚo/B aver
SFX j er aralo/B aver
SFX j er arami/K aver
SFX j er aratu/O aver
SFX j er arave/FS aver
SFX j er aremo/EL aver
SFX j er aren/L aver
SFX j er areni/M aver
SFX j er arense aver
SFX j er aresi/P aver
SFX j er aresiu/Q aver
SFX j er arié/P aver
SFX j er ariéu/Q aver
SFX j er arimo/L aver
SFX j er arion/L aver
SFX j er arioni/M aver
SFX j er arionse aver
SFX j er arisen/L aver
SFX j er ariseni/M aver
SFX j er arisense aver
SFX j er arisié/P aver
SFX j er arisiéu/Q aver
SFX j er arisi/P aver
SFX j er arision/L aver
SFX j er arisioni/M aver
SFX j er arisionse aver
SFX j er arisiu/Q aver
SFX j er arison/L aver
SFX j er arisoni/M aver
SFX j er arisonse aver
SFX j er aron/L aver
SFX j er aroni/M aver
SFX j er aronse aver
SFX j er eƚo/B aver
SFX j er elo/B aver
SFX j er emi/K aver
SFX j er ié/P aver
SFX j er iéu/Q aver
SFX j er iede/P aver
SFX j er iege/P aver
SFX j er ime/H aver
SFX j er imo/EL aver
SFX j er ion/EL aver
SFX j er ioni/M aver
SFX j er ionme/G aver
SFX j er isen/L aver
SFX j er iseni/M aver
SFX j er isense aver
SFX j er isié/P aver
SFX j er isiede/P aver
SFX j er isiege/P aver
SFX j er ision/L aver
SFX j er isioni/M aver
SFX j er isionse aver
SFX j er ison/L aver
SFX j er isoni/M aver
SFX j er isonse aver
SFX j er iven/L aver
SFX j er iveni/M aver
SFX j er ivense aver
SFX j er ivié/P aver
SFX j er iviéu/Q aver
SFX j er ivion/L aver
SFX j er ivioni/M aver
SFX j er ivionse aver
SFX j er ivon/L aver
SFX j er ivoni/M aver
SFX j er ivonse aver
SFX j er on/EL aver
SFX j er oni/M aver
SFX j er onme/G aver
SFX j er udo/B aver
SFX j r de aver
SFX j r ge aver
SFX j r me/H aver
SFX j r mo/L aver
SFX j r n/L aver
SFX j r ni/M aver
SFX j r nse aver
SFX j r nte/I aver
SFX j r se/IT aver
SFX j r va/FJLP aver
SFX j r ve/JL aver
SFX j r vi/NP aver
SFX j r vo/JL aver
SFX j ver ƚo/B aver
SFX j ver e/FJKL aver
SFX j ver lo/B aver
SFX j ver mi/K aver
SFX j ver piè/JL aver
SFX j ver pièmi/K aver
SFX j ver pié/P aver
SFX j ver piémoi/M aver
SFX j ver piéu/Q aver
SFX j ver pi/FN aver
SFX j ver pia/E aver
SFX j ver pie/EFIJKL aver
SFX j ver piede/P aver
SFX j ver piege/P aver
SFX j ver piemo/EL aver
SFX j ver pien/L aver
SFX j ver pieni/M aver
SFX j ver pime/H aver
SFX j ver pion/EL aver
SFX j ver pioni/M aver
SFX j ver pionme/G aver
SFX j ver pitu/O aver
SFX j ver rà/FJLN gaver
SFX j ver ràe/F gaver
SFX j ver ràveƚo/B gaver
SFX j ver ràvelo/B gaver
SFX j ver ràvemi/K gaver
SFX j ver rè/JL gaver
SFX j ver rèmi/K gaver
SFX j ver ré/P gaver
SFX j ver rémoi/M gaver
SFX j ver rémome/G gaver
SFX j ver rémomene/G gaver
SFX j ver résimo/L gaver
SFX j ver résimoi/M gaver
SFX j ver résitu/O gaver
SFX j ver réu/Q gaver
SFX j ver rí/P gaver
SFX j ver ría/FJLN gaver
SFX j ver ríami/K gaver
SFX j ver ríatu/O gaver
SFX j ver ríeƚo/B gaver
SFX j ver ríe/FJL gaver
SFX j ver ríelo/B gaver
SFX j ver ríemi/K gaver
SFX j ver rímoi/M gaver
SFX j ver rísitu/O gaver
SFX j ver ríu/Q gaver
SFX j ver rò/JL gaver
SFX j ver ròmi/K gaver
SFX j ver raƚo/B gaver
SFX j ver ralo/B gaver
SFX j ver rami/K gaver
SFX j ver ratu/O gaver
SFX j ver rave/FS gaver
SFX j ver remo/EL gaver
SFX j ver resi/P gaver
SFX j ver resiu/Q gaver
SFX j ver rimo/L gaver
SFX j ver risi/P gaver
SFX j ver risiu/Q gaver
SFX j ver tu/O aver

# vèrbi -ér inregolari ((re)toler, (mal|re)voler)
# themeT1 + r/AbikE
# themeT8 + o/bikJL
SFX k Y 60
SFX k er éndome/G er
SFX k er éndomene/G er
SFX k ler rà/FJLN oler
SFX k ler ràe/F oler
SFX k ler ràvelo/B oler
SFX k ler ràveƚo/B oler
SFX k ler ràvemi/K oler
SFX k ler rè/JL oler
SFX k ler rèmi/K oler
SFX k ler ré/P oler
SFX k ler résimo/L oler
SFX k ler résimoi/M oler
SFX k ler résitu/O oler
SFX k ler réu/Q oler
SFX k ler rí/P oler
SFX k ler ría/FJLN oler
SFX k ler ríami/K oler
SFX k ler ríatu/O oler
SFX k ler ríe/FJL oler
SFX k ler ríelo/B oler
SFX k ler ríeƚo/B oler
SFX k ler ríemi/K oler
SFX k ler rísitu/O oler
SFX k ler ríu/Q oler
SFX k ler rò/JL oler
SFX k ler ròmi/K oler
SFX k ler rave/FS oler
SFX k ler remo/EL oler
SFX k ler ren/L oler
SFX k ler rense oler
SFX k ler resi/P oler
SFX k ler resiu/Q oler
SFX k ler rié/P oler
SFX k ler riéu/Q oler
SFX k ler rimo/EL oler
SFX k ler rion/L oler
SFX k ler rione/M oler
SFX k ler rionse oler
SFX k ler risen/L oler
SFX k ler risense oler
SFX k ler risié/P oler
SFX k ler risiéu/Q oler
SFX k ler risi/P oler
SFX k ler rision/L oler
SFX k ler risioni/M oler
SFX k ler risionse oler
SFX k ler risiu/Q oler
SFX k ler rison/L oler
SFX k ler risoni/M oler
SFX k ler risonse oler
SFX k ler ron/EL oler
SFX k ler roni/M oler
SFX k ler ronme/G oler
SFX k lo gò/JL tòlo
SFX k lo gòmi/K tòlo
SFX k lo ga tòlo
SFX k lo gi/FN tòlo
SFX k lo gime/H tòlo
SFX k lo gitu/O tòlo
SFX k lo go/JL tòlo
