public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-crx-build/vec.dic
aver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
gaver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
reaver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
regaver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
saver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
sao/jJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:saver
strasaver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
strasào/jJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:strasaver
resaver/AjE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
resào/jJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:resaver
tolo/bkIJL	po:verb is:indicative_present_1s st:toler
retoler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
voler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
'oler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
malvoler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
revoler/AbkE	po:verb is:infinitive_simple
